New York, session 2025-2026, S4411.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1266-n to read as follows: 3 § 1266-n. Long Island Rail Road and Metro-North Commuter Railroad 4 Company; transfers to New York city transit. Notwithstanding any other 5 provision of law, general, special or local, the authority, in conjunc- 6 tion with the New York city transit authority, shall develop and imple- 7 ment a weekly and a monthly ticket valid for optional, discounted trans- 8 fers between the Long Island Rail Road and the Metro-North Commuter 9 Railroad Company to the New York city transit authority subways and 10 buses. 11 § 2. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new section 12 1219-b to read as follows: 13 § 1219-b. Authority; transfers to Long Island Railroad and Metro-North 14 Commuter Railroad Company. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 15 general, special or local, the authority, in conjunction with the metro- 16 politan transportation authority, shall develop and implement a weekly 17 and a monthly ticket valid for optional, discounted transfers between 18 the authority subways and buses to the Long Island Rail Road and the 19 Metro-North Commuter Railroad Company. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08750-01-5